test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-barrat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - bårråt: # Verb 'eat'
     bårråt+V+Inf: bårråt
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: båråv
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bårå
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bårrá
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: burrin
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: bårråbehtin #, bårråbähtten]
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [bårråba, bårråban]
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: bårråp
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: bårråbehtit #, bårråbähttet]
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: burri

     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: burriv
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: burri
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: båråj
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: båråjmen
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: båråjden
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [båråjga, båråjgan]
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: båråjme
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: båråjde
     bårråt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: burrin

     bårråt+V+Imprt+Sg2: bårå  
     bårråt+V+Imprt+Du2: bårren
     bårråt+V+Imprt+Pl2: burrit

#     bårråt+V+Pot+Sg1: burutjav
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Sg2: burutja
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Sg3: burutj
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Du1: burutjin
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Du2: burutjähppen #, burutjehpin]
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Du3: burutjiebá
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Pl1: burutjip
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Pl2: burutjihpit
#     bårråt+V+Pot+Pl3: burutji

     bårråt+V+ConNeg: bårå 
     bårråt+V+GerI: bårådin 
#     bårråt+V+Sup: båråtjit
#     bårråt+V+Vabe: bårråk  
     bårråt+V+Vgen: bårå 
     bårråt+V+GerII: bårråmin
     bårråt+V+PrfPrc: bårråm
#     bårråt+V+PrsPrc: bårrå 
#     bårråt+V+Vsubst: bårråm
